Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB758.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 157.069 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative operations costs" means costs associated with the operations
and staffing of a state-operated area technology center, including but not
limited to personnel, facility costs, building utilities and maintenance, and
custodial and office supplies;
(b) "Approved career and technical education dual credit" means earning a grade
of "C" or higher for a Kentucky Department of Education-approved career
and technical education dual credit course equivalent to three (3) hours of
college credit;
(c) "Approved career and technical education pathway" means a four (4) course
career and technical education pathway approved by the Kentucky
Department of Education that provides a coherent, articulated sequence of
rigorous academic and career-related courses within a career and technical
education program area, and leads to an associate degree, an industry-
recognized certificate or license, or a baccalaureate or higher degree;
(d) "Concentrator" means a student who has earned at least two (2) credits for no
less than two (2) courses in a single career and technical education pathway;
(e) "Converted career and technical education center" means a center providing
locally operated career and technical education for which a local district
assumed authority from the state for the management and control of the center
during the 2020-2021, 2021-2022, or 2022-2023 academic years;
(f) "General-cost career and technical education program" means a career and
technical education program or pathway in which high-cost technical
equipment, materials, or facilities are not required;
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
(g) "General-cost full-time equivalents" means the total number of secondary
students enrolled in general-cost career and technical education programs,
multiplied by the number of hours those students are enrolled, and divided by
six (6) hours;
(h) "High-cost career and technical education program" means a career and
technical education program or pathway in which high-cost equipment,
materials, or facilities are required;
(i) "Locally operated career and technical education" means a district program
that provides secondary students with one (1) or more approved career and
technical education pathways;
(j) "State-operated area technology center" means a state-operated secondary
school facility with the primary purpose of offering approved career and
technical education pathways;
(k) "Supplemental funding" or "supplemental funds" means moneys appropriated
by the General Assembly to support qualifying locally operated career and
technical education centers and programs and state-operated area technology
centers and programs based on enrollment and incentive criteria;
(l) "Technical skill attainment" means earning an industry-recognized
certification, licensure, or credential as identified by the Kentucky Workforce
Innovation Board pursuant to KRS 158.6455(1)(e) or passing an end-of-
program assessment for articulated postsecondary credit as designated by the
Kentucky Department of Education Office of Career and Technical
Education;
(m) "Weighted high-cost full-time equivalents" means the total number of
secondary students enrolled in high-cost career and technical education
programs, multiplied by the number of credit hours in which those students
are enrolled, divided by six (6) hours, and multiplied by one and one-half
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
(1.5); and
(n) "Work-based learning program" means a cooperative education program,
internship, or registered apprenticeship within the student's chosen approved
career and technical education pathway.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide funds from the department's
annual general fund appropriation to support the administrative operations costs of
state-operated area technology centers and converted career and technical education
centers.
(3) For converted career and technical education centers, beginning with fiscal year
2024-2025, the Kentucky Department of Education shall deduct from funds
designated for the state-operated area technology centers an amount equal to the
administrative operations costs of each converted career and technical education
center in the amount received by the center in the most recent fiscal year that the
center was under state management and control. The funds for each converted
career and technical education center shall be divided as follows:
(a) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the funds shall be sent to the local district that
has assumed management and control of the center; and
(b) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds shall be sent to the career and
technical education innovation and support fund established in subsection (4)
of this section.
(4) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a restricted fund to be known
as the career and technical education innovation and support fund to receive
the funds allocated under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The fund shall
consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal
funds. The fund shall be administered by the Office of Career and Technical
Education. Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for:
1. Supporting innovation in new or emerging career fields;
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
2. Supporting state-operated area technology centers that may experience
hardship or natural disasters;
3. Personnel costs to provide technical assistance to local districts
providing locally operated career and technical education, including
technical assistance relating to the monitoring and oversight on the use
of supplemental career and technical education funding; and
4. Any other purposes reasonably related to improving student outcomes in
career and technical education.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the
Kentucky Department of Education shall distribute to local districts providing
locally operated career and technical education and to state-operated area
technology centers all general funds designated as supplemental funds to career and
technical education programs, subject to the following:
(a) A local district providing locally operated career and technical education or a
state-operated area technology center shall maintain eligibility for receipt of
federal funding pursuant to the Strengthening Career and Technical Education
for the 21st Century Act, Pub. L. No. 115-224, to be eligible to receive
supplemental funding pursuant to this subsection;
(b) All supplemental funds distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be used to
improve student outcomes in career and technical education pathways for
students in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), including but not limited to
student supplies, resources, materials, and equipment that is designed for
enhanced quality of instruction in a career and technical education pathway,
the purchase and maintenance of industry standard equipment, assisting
students with achieving technical skill attainment, and supporting career and
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
technical student organization participation;
(c) 1. Supplemental funds for career and technical education shall be divided
and allocated to each local district providing locally operated career and
technical education and to each state-operated area technology center,
with seventy-five[sixty] percent (75%)[(60%)] dedicated for enrollment-
based funding and twenty-five[forty] percent (25%)[(40%)] for
incentive-based funding.
2. The seventy-five[sixty] percent (75%)[(60%)] enrollment-based funding
shall be based on a statewide full-time equivalent calculation of the total
weighted high-cost full-time equivalents and general-cost full-time
equivalents during the prior school year, subject to the following:
a. The department shall then distribute the enrollment-based funds
for each state-operated area technology center or local district
providing locally operated career and technical education based on
the center's or district's proportional share of the combined
weighted high-cost full-time equivalents and general-cost full-time
equivalents of the prior year;
b. The department shall distribute the state-operated area technology
center fund portion to the respective state-operated area
technology centers and the local district fund portion to the
respective local districts; and
c. The department shall classify qualifying programs as either a high-
cost career and technical education program or a general-cost
career and technical education program.
3. The twenty-five[forty] percent (25%)[(40%)] incentives-based funding
shall be based on an annual statewide calculation of the total number of
qualifying student incentives. The calculation shall only use students
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
that are in grade twelve (12) and use the total qualifying student
incentives earned by those students during secondary education at a
state-operated area technology center or within a local district. Once a
student has been included in a year's calculation, that student shall not
be included in any subsequent year's calculation, subject to the
following:
a. The first qualifying student incentive[incentives] for students in
their grade twelve (12) year shall be attained if the student
reached the designation of a concentrator. Upon reaching the
designation, a student may attain a second qualifying student
incentive by[include]:
i. [Reaching the designation of a concentrator;
ii. ]Technical skill attainment;
ii.[iii.] Completing a required number of hours or achieving a
benchmark within a work-based learning program; or[and]
iii.[iv.] Earning an approved career and technical education
dual credit;
b. The incentives in subdivision a. of this subparagraph shall be
allotted to the state-operated area technology center or local
district in which it was earned. Each type of incentive shall only be
counted once per student at state-operated area technology centers
and once per student at local districts for a maximum of two
(2)[four (4)] incentives per student at state-operated area
technology centers and two (2)[four (4)] incentives at local
districts throughout their secondary career and technical education.
For incentive criteria that is achieved more than once at state-
operated area technology centers, the incentive shall be counted
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
for the state-operated area technology center where it was first
achieved. For incentive criteria that is achieved more than once at
local districts, the incentive shall be counted for the local district
where it was first achieved;
c. The department shall distribute incentives-based funds for each
state-operated area technology center or local district based on the
center's or district's proportional share of the combined number of
qualifying student incentives achieved by students in grade twelve
(12) at a state-operated area technology center or within a local
district throughout their secondary career and technical education.
The incentives-based funds shall be distributed to the state-
operated area technology center or local district in which the
incentive was achieved; and
d. The department shall distribute the state-operated area technology
center fund portion to the respective state-operated area
technology centers and the local district fund portion to the
respective local districts;
(d) There shall be no mid-year adjustment to the allocation of career and technical
education supplemental funding for a center or local district; and
(e) Notwithstanding the restriction in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a district
may submit a waiver request to the Office of Career and Technical Education
to use a portion of its allocation of supplemental funds for career and
technical education programming for students in grades (5) through eight (8).
The district shall submit a request which details the district's plan for career
and technical education programming for students in grades five (5) through
eight (8). In reviewing the request, the Office of Career and Technical
Education shall consider whether:
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
1. The district details a plan for orientation and exploration of broad-based
industries by giving students knowledge and experience regarding
careers within these industries and exploratory or hands-on skills used in
the industry;
2. There is direct alignment between middle and secondary career and
technical education pathways within the requesting district; and
3. Such designation of supplemental funding for programming for students
in grades five (5) through eight (8) does not have a significant
detrimental impact on the programming available for students in
secondary grades.
(6) The Office of Career and Technical Education shall monitor and provide oversight
of state funds distributed pursuant to this section to ensure that the use of funding
by eligible recipients meets the approved criteria as described in this section.
(7) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed in the administration of this
section and for disbursement of moneys.
(8) The Kentucky Department of Education shall publish on the department's website:
(a) The list of all career and technical education programs available to students
and the program's designation as a high-cost career and technical education
program or as a general-cost career and technical education program;
(b) A report of the supplemental funding amounts provided to each local district
and to each state-operated area technology center, including an explanation of
the amount designated as enrollment-based funding and as incentives-based
funding; and
(c) A report of the administrative operations costs provided to each state-operated
area technology center and to each converted career and technical education
center, as well as the amount contributed toward the career and technical
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1514
education innovation and support fund.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:58 PM Jacketed